Utah statutes.
10-3-1312.   Violation of disclosure requirements -- Penalties -- Rescission of prohibited transaction.

If any transaction is entered into in connection with a violation of Section 10-3-1305, 10-3-1306, 10-3-1307, or 10-3-1308, the municipality:

(1)  shall dismiss or remove the appointed or elected officer or municipal employee who knowingly and intentionally violates this part from employment or office; and

(2)  may rescind or void any contract or subcontract entered into pursuant to that transaction without returning any part of the consideration received by the municipality.



Amended by Chapter 147, 1989 General Session

